Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1024
Electrolysis, defined.

Electrolysis means the permanent removal of hair by the application of an electrical current to the dermal papilla by a filament to cause decomposition, coagulation, or dehydration within the hair follicle by means of short wave or galvanic current or the blend, as approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration.

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 8;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-356.05;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 286.